Hawaii statutes.
§431:7-306 Director may designate
depositary. At the request of an insurer, the director of finance may
designate any solvent trust company or other solvent financial institution
having trust powers, domiciled in the United States, as the director's depositary
to receive and hold any such deposit. Any deposit so held shall be at the
expense of the insurer. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next